Utah statutes.
54-14-202.   Public utility to provide standard cost and estimated excess cost.

(1) (a)  A public utility shall provide the information described in Subsection (1)(b) if a local government:

(i)  is considering imposing requirements or conditions on construction of a facility that may result in an estimated excess cost and requests that the public utility provide the estimated excess cost; or

(ii)  recommends an alternative to the public utility's proposed high voltage transmission line corridor in accordance with the provisions of Title 54, Chapter 18, Siting of High Voltage Power Line Act.

(b)  Subject to Subsection (1)(a), a public utility shall provide to the local government:

(i) (A)  the estimated standard cost of the facility; and

(B)  the estimated excess cost of the facility if constructed in accordance with local government requirements or conditions; and

(ii)  the estimated cost of the alternative line corridor proposed by a local government provided that all affected land use authorities agree to the alternative line corridor proposed by the local government.

(2)  If a public utility does not provide the information as described in Subsection (1), the local government may:

(a)  appeal to the board; and

(b)  request that the board review the information provided by the public utility.

(3) (a)  If the board finds that the public utility has failed to provide the standard costs and estimated excess costs in accordance with the provisions of Subsection (1), the board may request additional information from the public utility.

(b)  In accordance with Subsection (3)(a), a public utility shall provide any information requested by the board within 30 days of the day that the request was made.

(c)  If a public utility fails to comply with Subsections (3)(a) and (b), the board may suspend issuing its written decision in accordance with Section 54-14-305 for 30 days after the day on which the public utility provides the information requested under Subsection (3)(a).



Amended by Chapter 316, 2009 General Session

